Hawaii statutes.
§453-2 License required; exceptions. (a)
Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall practice medicine or
surgery in the State, either gratuitously or for pay, or offer to practice
medicine or surgery in the State, or advertise or announce one's self, either
publicly or privately, as prepared or qualified to practice medicine or surgery
in the State, or append the letters "Dr.", "M.D.", or
"D.O." to one's name with the intent to imply that the person is a
practitioner of medicine or surgery, without having a valid unrevoked license
or a limited and temporary license obtained from the Hawaii medical board.

(b) Nothing herein shall:

(1) Apply to so-called Christian Scientists; provided
that the Christian Scientists practice the religious tenets of their church
without pretending a knowledge of medicine or surgery;

(2) Prohibit service in the case of emergency or the
domestic administration of family remedies;

(3) Apply to any commissioned medical officer in the
United States armed forces or public health service engaged in the discharge of
one's official duty, including a commissioned medical officer employed by the
United States Department of Defense, while providing direct telehealth support
or services to neighbor island beneficiaries within a Hawaii National Guard
armory on the island of Kauai, Hawaii, Molokai, or Maui; provided that the
commissioned medical officer employed by the United States Department of
Defense is credentialed by Tripler Army Medical Center;

(4) Apply to any practitioner of medicine and surgery
from another state when in actual consultation, including in-person, mail,
electronic, telephonic, fiber-optic, or other telehealth consultation with a
licensed physician or osteopathic physician of this State, if the physician or
osteopathic physician from another state at the time of consultation is
licensed to practice in the state in which the physician or osteopathic
physician resides; provided that:

(A) The physician or osteopathic physician
from another state shall not open an office, or appoint a place to meet
patients in this State, or receive calls within the limits of the State for the
provision of care for a patient who is located in this State;

(B) The licensed physician or osteopathic
physician of this State retains control and remains responsible for the
provision of care for the patient who is located in this State; and

(C) The laws and rules relating to contagious
diseases are not violated;

(5) Prohibit services rendered by any person
certified under part II of this chapter to provide emergency medical services,
or any physician assistant, when the services are rendered under the direction
and control of a physician or osteopathic physician licensed in this State
except for final refraction resulting in a prescription for spectacles, contact
lenses, or visual training as performed by an oculist or optometrist duly
licensed by the State. The direction and control shall not be construed in
every case to require the personal presence of the supervising and controlling
physician or osteopathic physician. Any physician or osteopathic physician who
employs or directs a person certified under part II of this chapter to provide
emergency medical services, or a physician assistant, shall retain full
professional and personal responsibility for any act that constitutes the
practice of medicine when performed by the certified person or physician
assistant;

(6) Prohibit automated external defibrillation by:

(A) Any first responder personnel certified
by the department of health to provide automated external defibrillation when
it is rendered under the medical oversight of a physician or osteopathic
physician licensed in this State; or

(B) Any person acting in accordance with
section 663‑1.5(e); or

(7) [Paragraph effective until December 31, 2016.
For paragraph effective January 1, 2017, see below.] Prohibit a
radiologist duly licensed to practice medicine and provide radiology services
in another state from using telehealth while located in this State to provide
radiology services to a patient who is located in the state in which the
radiologist is licensed. For the purposes of this paragraph:

"Radiologist" means a doctor of
medicine or a doctor of osteopathy certified in radiology by the American Board
of Radiology or the American Board of Osteopathy.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications, as that term is defined in section 269-1, including but not
limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive
and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous
information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including
diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical
interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health
care services and information to parties separated by distance. Standard
telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail texts, in combination or
by themselves, do not constitute a telehealth service for the purposes of this
paragraph.

(7) [Paragraph effective January 1, 2017. For
paragraph effective until December 31, 2016, see above.] Prohibit a
radiologist duly licensed to practice medicine and provide radiology services
in another state from using telehealth while located in this State to provide
radiology services to a patient who is located in the state in which the
radiologist is licensed. For the purposes of this paragraph:

"Distant site" means the location
of the radiologist delivering services through telehealth at the time the
services are provided.

"Originating site" means the
location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health
care provider, at the time services are provided by a radiologist through
telehealth, including but not limited to a radiologist's or health care
provider's office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other
non-medical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based
health centers, or the work location of a patient.

"Radiologist" means a doctor of
medicine or a doctor of osteopathy certified in radiology by the American Board
of Radiology or the American Board of Osteopathy.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications, as that term is defined in section 269-1, to encompass four
modalities: store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live
consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time
video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to
transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital
images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the
purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a
patient is at an originating site and the radiologist is at a distant site.
Standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail texts, in
combination or by themselves, do not constitute a telehealth service for the
purposes of this paragraph.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit
healing practices by traditional Hawaiian healers engaged in traditional Native
Hawaiian healing practices, both as recognized and certified as such by any
kupuna council convened by Papa Ola Lokahi. No person or organization involved
with the selection of kupuna council members, the convening of a kupuna
council, or the certification process of healers under this subsection shall be
sued or held liable for any cause of action that may arise out of their
participation in the selection, convening, or certification process. Nothing
in this chapter shall limit, alter, or otherwise adversely affect any rights of
practice of traditional Native Hawaiian healing pursuant to the Constitution of
the State of Hawaii. [L 1896, c 60, §1; am L 1905, c 48, §1; am L 1909, c 124,
§1; am L 1919, c 22, §1; am L 1920, c 37, §2; am L 1921, c 14; RL 1925, §1022;
am L 1925, c 26, §1; RL 1935, §1200; am L 1939, c 183, §1; RL 1945, §2501; RL
1955, §64-2; am L 1959, c 271, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §453-2; am L
1969, c 257, §1; am L 1973, c 111, §1; am L 1976, c 219, §6; am L 1977, c 167,
§12; am L 1978, c 148, §2(2); am L 1982, c 112, §4; am L 1983, c 92, pt of
§1(1); am L 1984, c 168, §7; am L 1985, c 68, §14; am L 1987, c 147, §1; am L
1988, c 110, §1; am L 1993, c 163, §1; am L 1997, c 364, §3; am L 1998, c 160,
§1 and c 162, §§3, 6; am L 2000, c 209, §1(2); am L 2001, c 304, §§1, 3; am L
2005, c 153, §1; am L 2007, c 91, §1 and c 255, §1; am L 2008, c 5, §3 and c 9,
§3; am L 2013, c 189, §2; am L 2014, c 159, §8; am L 2016, c 226, §10]

Note

Papa Ola Lokahi; definitions and other related matters. L
1998, c 162; L 2000, c 209; L 2001, c 304; L 2005, c 153.

L 2007, c 255, §3 provides:

"SECTION 3. Nothing herein shall be deemed to permit a
radiologist without a license to practice medicine in Hawaii, wherever located,
to provide services to a patient who is located in Hawaii."

Attorney General Opinions

There is no prohibition against the use by unlicensed doctor
of the letters "Dr." or any synonym thereof if the possibility for
deception is removed. Att. Gen. Op. 63-55.

Foreign professional (medical) corporation cannot transact
business in Hawaii as a foreign corporation. Att. Gen. Op. 80-5.

Case Notes

Prior to enactment of chapter, both license and certificate
from board of health were necessary. 4 H. 9 (1877).

Treasurer cannot revoke licenses issued on recommendation of
board of health. 15 H. 273 (1903).

L 1905, c 48, requiring applicant to pay fee held invalid.
17 H. 389 (1906).

City and county cannot pass an ordinance injuriously
affecting the status of territorial licenses. 29 H. 422 (1926).

Pleading and proof in prosecution for practicing medicine
without license. 21 H. 465 (1913).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next